Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3105
Code of conduct, defined.

Code of conduct means that set of regulatory rules of professional conduct which has been adopted by the board to protect the public welfare by providing rules that govern a professional's behavior in the professional relationship.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 66;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1039.